Idaho, session 2026, H0598.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6604. ACCOUNTS OF POLITICAL TREASURER. (1) All campaign contribu-
tions, including any personal funds or loans from a candidate, shall be de-
posited into a campaign account established exclusively for the candidate
or political committee. No personal funds of a candidate or any other per-
son shall be commingled with any contributions received by the candidate or
political committee. The political treasurer for each candidate or polit-
ical committee shall maintain such account separately from any personal or
business accounts and shall report all contributions, deposits, and expen-
ditures therefrom in accordance with this chapter. The political treasurer
for each candidate or political committee shall keep detailed accounts, cur-
rent within not more than seven (7) days after the date of receiving the con-
tribution or making an expenditure, of all contributions received and all
expenditures made by or on behalf of the candidate or political committee
that are required to be set forth in a statement filed under this chapter.
A candidate who makes a loan of personal funds to the candidate's own cam-
paign shall deposit the full amount of the loan into the candidate's campaign
account. The candidate shall, within seven (7) days of making the deposit,
file with the secretary of state a written report certifying that the loan
was deposited, stating the exact amount of the loan, and identifying the fi-
nancial institution where the funds were deposited.
(2) Accounts kept by the political treasurer for a candidate or politi-
cal committee may be inspected before the election to which the accounts re-
fer by the secretary of state, or county clerk for local government offices
or measures, or his agent or employee, who is making an investigation pur-
suant to section 67-6615, Idaho Code.
(3) Accounts kept by a political treasurer shall be preserved by him for
at least one (1) year after the date of the election to which the accounts re-
fer or at least one (1) year after the date the last statement is filed under
section 67-6607, Idaho Code, whichever is later.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.